Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.400

Supplemental assessments—Limitation of time for.

No city or town shall have jurisdiction to proceed with any supplemental assessment unless the ordinance ordering it is passed by the city or town council within ten years from and after the time that it was finally determined that the total amount of valid assessments levied and assessed on account of a local improvement was insufficient to pay the whole or that portion of the cost and expense thereof to be paid by special assessment.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.400. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 45, part; RRS s 9398, part.]